Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.700

Dyslexia screening tools.

(1) By September 1, 2019, the superintendent of public instruction, after considering recommendations from the dyslexia advisory council convened under *RCW 28A.300.710, must identify screening tools and resources that, at a minimum, meet the following best practices to:

(a) Satisfy developmental and academic criteria, including considerations of validity and reliability, that indicate typical literacy development or dyslexia, taking into account typical child neurological development; and

(b) Identify indicators and areas of weakness that are highly predictive of future reading difficulty, including phonological awareness, phonemic awareness, rapid naming skills, letter sound knowledge, and family history of difficulty with reading and language acquisition.

(2) Beginning September 1, 2019, the superintendent of public instruction must maintain on the agency's website the list of screening tools and resources identified under this section and must include links to the tools and resources, when available.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction must review and update the list of screening tools and resources identified under this section as appropriate.

[ 2018 c 75 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.300.710 expired August 1, 2023.